Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB733.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1503(a) of Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 1503. Persons qualified to solemnize marriages.(a) General rule.--The following are authorized to solemnize marriages between persons that produce a marriage license issued under this part:* * *(7) An individual of a religious order, body or institution authorized by the rules and customs of that order, body or institution to perform a marriage ceremony.* * *SECTION 1. SECTION 1503(A) OF TITLE 23 OF THE PENNSYLVANIA <--<--1234567891011121314151617 CONSOLIDATED STATUTES IS AMENDED AND THE SECTION IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SUBSECTION TO READ:§ 1503. PERSONS QUALIFIED TO SOLEMNIZE MARRIAGES.(A) GENERAL RULE.--THE FOLLOWING ARE AUTHORIZED TO SOLEMNIZE MARRIAGES BETWEEN PERSONS THAT PRODUCE A MARRIAGE LICENSE ISSUED UNDER THIS PART:[(1) A JUSTICE, JUDGE OR MAGISTERIAL DISTRICT JUDGE OF THIS COMMONWEALTH.(2) A FORMER OR RETIRED JUSTICE, JUDGE OR MAGISTERIAL DISTRICT JUDGE OF THIS COMMONWEALTH WHO IS SERVING AS A SENIOR JUDGE OR SENIOR MAGISTERIAL DISTRICT JUDGE AS PROVIDED OR PRESCRIBED BY LAW; OR NOT SERVING AS A SENIOR JUDGE OR SENIOR MAGISTERIAL DISTRICT JUDGE BUT MEETS THE FOLLOWING CRITERIA:(I) HAS SERVED AS A MAGISTERIAL DISTRICT JUDGE, JUDGE OR JUSTICE, WHETHER OR NOT CONTINUOUSLY OR ON THE SAME COURT, BY ELECTION OR APPOINTMENT FOR AN AGGREGATE PERIOD EQUALING A FULL TERM OF OFFICE;(II) HAS NOT BEEN DEFEATED FOR REELECTION OR RETENTION;(III) HAS NOT BEEN CONVICTED OF, PLEADED NOLO CONTENDERE TO OR AGREED TO AN ACCELERATED REHABILITATIVE DISPOSITION OR OTHER PROBATION WITHOUT VERDICT PROGRAM RELATIVE TO ANY MISDEMEANOR OR FELONY OFFENSE UNDER THE LAWS OF THIS COMMONWEALTH OR AN EQUIVALENT OFFENSE UNDER THE LAWS OF THE UNITED STATES OR ONE OF ITS TERRITORIES OR POSSESSIONS, ANOTHER STATE, THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, THE COMMONWEALTH OF PUERTO RICO OR A FOREIGN NATION;(IV) HAS NOT RESIGNED A JUDICIAL COMMISSION TO AVOID HAVING CHARGES FILED OR TO AVOID PROSECUTION BY FEDERAL, 20250HB0733PN3636 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 STATE OR LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCIES OR BY THE JUDICIAL CONDUCT BOARD;(V) HAS NOT BEEN REMOVED FROM OFFICE BY THE COURT OF JUDICIAL DISCIPLINE; AND(VI) IS A RESIDENT OF THIS COMMONWEALTH.(3) AN ACTIVE OR SENIOR JUDGE OR FULL-TIME MAGISTRATE OF THE DISTRICT COURTS OF THE UNITED STATES FOR THE EASTERN, MIDDLE OR WESTERN DISTRICT OF PENNSYLVANIA.(3.1) AN ACTIVE, RETIRED OR SENIOR BANKRUPTCY JUDGE OF THE UNITED STATES BANKRUPTCY COURTS FOR THE EASTERN, MIDDLE OR WESTERN DISTRICT OF PENNSYLVANIA WHO IS A RESIDENT OF THIS COMMONWEALTH.(4) AN ACTIVE, RETIRED OR SENIOR JUDGE OF THE UNITED STATES COURT OF APPEALS FOR THE THIRD CIRCUIT WHO IS A RESIDENT OF THIS COMMONWEALTH.(5) A MAYOR OF ANY CITY OR BOROUGH OF THIS COMMONWEALTH.(5.1) A FORMER MAYOR OF A CITY OR BOROUGH OF THIS COMMONWEALTH WHO:(I) HAS NOT BEEN DEFEATED FOR REELECTION;(II) HAS NOT BEEN CONVICTED OF, PLEADED NOLO CONTENDERE TO OR AGREED TO AN ACCELERATED REHABILITATIVE DISPOSITION OR OTHER PROBATION WITHOUT VERDICT PROGRAM RELATIVE TO A MISDEMEANOR OR FELONY OFFENSE UNDER THE LAWS OF THIS COMMONWEALTH OR AN EQUIVALENT OFFENSE UNDER THE LAWS OF THE UNITED STATES OR ANY ONE OF ITS POSSESSIONS, ANOTHER STATE, THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, THE COMMONWEALTH OF PUERTO RICO OR A FOREIGN NATION;(III) HAS NOT RESIGNED THE POSITION OF MAYOR TO AVOID HAVING CHARGES FILED OR TO AVOID PROSECUTION BY FEDERAL, STATE OR LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCIES;20250HB0733PN3636 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (IV) HAS SERVED AS A MAYOR, WHETHER CONTINUOUSLY OR NOT, BY ELECTION FOR AN AGGREGATE OF A FULL TERM IN OFFICE; AND(V) IS A RESIDENT OF THIS COMMONWEALTH.(6) A MINISTER, PRIEST OR RABBI OF ANY REGULARLY ESTABLISHED CHURCH OR CONGREGATION.](1) AN ACTIVE OR FORMER GOVERNOR OR LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR.(2) AN ACTIVE OR FORMER MEMBER OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.(3) AN ACTIVE OR FORMER JUSTICE, JUDGE OR MAGISTERIAL DISTRICT JUDGE OF THIS COMMONWEALTH.(4) AN ACTIVE, RETIRED OR SENIOR JUDGE OR FULL-TIME MAGISTRATE OF THE DISTRICT COURTS OF THE UNITED STATES FOR THE EASTERN, MIDDLE OR WESTERN DISTRICT OF PENNSYLVANIA.(5) AN ACTIVE, RETIRED OR SENIOR BANKRUPTCY JUDGE OF THE UNITED STATES BANKRUPTCY COURTS FOR THE EASTERN, MIDDLE OR WESTERN DISTRICT OF PENNSYLVANIA.(6) AN ACTIVE OR FORMER MAYOR OF A CITY OR BOROUGH AND AN ACTIVE OR FORMER CHIEF EXECUTIVE OF A HOME RULE MUNICIPALITY OF THIS COMMONWEALTH.(7) A MINISTER, PRIEST OR RABBI OF ANY REGULARLY ESTABLISHED CHURCH OR CONGREGATION.(8) AN INDIVIDUAL OF A RELIGIOUS ORDER, BODY OR INSTITUTION AUTHORIZED BY THE RULES AND CUSTOMS OF THAT ORDER, BODY OR INSTITUTION TO PERFORM A MARRIAGE CEREMONY.(A.1) EXCEPTION.--AN INDIVIDUAL LISTED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) MAY NOT SOLEMNIZE MARRIAGES BETWEEN PERSONS THAT PRODUCE A MARRIAGE LICENSE ISSUED UNDER THIS PART IF:(1) THE INDIVIDUAL HAS BEEN CONVICTED OF ANY FELONY OFFENSE UNDER THE LAWS OF THIS COMMONWEALTH OR AN EQUIVALENT OFFENSE UNDER THE LAWS OF THE UNITED STATES OR ONE OF ITS 20250HB0733PN3636 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 TERRITORIES OR POSSESSIONS, ANOTHER STATE, THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, THE COMMONWEALTH OF PUERTO RICO OR A FOREIGN NATION.(2) THE INDIVIDUAL HAS RESIGNED FROM THE INDIVIDUAL'S POSITION TO AVOID HAVING CHARGES FILED OR TO AVOID PROSECUTION.(3) THE INDIVIDUAL HAS BEEN REMOVED FROM OFFICE.(4) THE INDIVIDUAL IS NOT A CURRENT RESIDENT OF THIS COMMONWEALTH.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0733PN3636 - 5 - 1234567891011